District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.34

Energy efficiency.

The District Department of the Environment shall:

(1)

Develop tools and resources for corner stores to reduce their operating costs by becoming more energy efficient; and

(2)

Promote energy efficiency programs to corner stores.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 304, 58 DCR 746